Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-1180
Member of any state commission, council, committee, or board; reimbursement for expenses; when.

Any member of any state commission, council, committee, or board who is not entitled to reimbursement under section 81-1178 or 81-1179 shall be entitled to be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 if an appropriation is made for such purpose and if the reimbursement is approved by the Governor or, in cases in which the commission, council, committee, or board has been created to assist the Legislature in the performance of its duties, by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.

Laws 1977, LB 365, § 4;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 214;

R.S.1943, (1981), § 84-306.08;

Laws 1990, LB 1032, § 1;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 112.
January 1, 2021